North Carolina statutes. Chapter 113. Conservation and Development.
Article 1A. Special Peace Officers.

§ 113-28.1.
Designated employees commissioned special peace officers by Governor.

Upon application by either the Secretary of Natural and Cultural Resources or the Secretary of Environmental Quality, the Governor is hereby authorized and empowered to commission as special peace officers such of the employees of the Departments as the Secretary may designate for the purpose of enforcing the laws and rules enacted or adopted for the protection, preservation and government of State parks, lakes, reservations and other lands or waters under the control or supervision of the respective Departments.

History.

1947, c. 577; 1973, c. 1262, s. 86; 1977, c. 771, s. 4; 1987, c. 783, s. 5; 1989, c. 727, s. 46; 1997-443, s. 11A.119(a); 2015-241, s. 14.30(oo).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(oo), effective July 1, 2015, rewrote the section.

§ 113-28.2.
Powers of arrest.

Any employee of either the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources or the Department of Environmental Quality commissioned as a special peace officer shall have the right to arrest with warrant any person violating any law or rule on or relating to the State parks, lakes, reservations and other lands or waters under the control or supervision of the employee’s respective Department, and shall have the power to pursue and arrest without warrant any person violating in his presence any law or rule on or relating to said parks, lakes, reservations and other lands or waters under the control or supervision of the employee’s respective Department.

History.

1947, c. 577; 1973, c. 1262, s. 86; 1977, c. 771, s. 4; 1989, c. 727, s. 47; 1997-443, s. 11A.119(a); 2015-241, s. 14.30(pp).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(pp), effective July 1, 2015, rewrote the section.

§ 113-28.2A.
Cooperation between law enforcement agencies.

Special peace officers employed by either the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources or the Department of Environmental Quality are officers of a “law enforcement agency” for purposes of

G.S. 160A-288

, and each Department shall have the same authority as a city or county governing body to approve cooperation between law enforcement agencies under that section.

History.

2002-111, s. 1; 2015-241, s. 14.30(qq).

Cross References.

As to cooperation between municipal law-enforcement agencies, see

G.S. 160A-288

.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(qq), effective July 1, 2015, rewrote the section.

§ 113-28.3.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1989, c. 485, s. 1.

§ 113-28.4.
Oaths required.

Before any employee of either the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources or the Department of Environmental Quality commissioned as a special peace officer shall exercise any power of arrest under this Article, the employee shall take the oaths required of public officers before an officer authorized to administer oaths.

History.

1947, c. 577; 1973, c. 1262, s. 86; 1977, c. 771, s. 4; 1989, c. 727, s. 218(48); 1997-443, s. 11A.119(a); 2015-241, s. 14.30(rr).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(rr), effective July 1, 2015, substituted “either the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources or the Department of Environmental Quality” for “the Department of Environment and Natural Resources” and “the employee” for “he.”